Utah statutes.
70A-3-403.   Unauthorized signature.
(1)  Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or Title 70A, Chapter 4,
Uniform Commercial Code -- Bank Deposits and Collections, an unauthorized
signature is ineffective except as the signature of the unauthorized signer in
favor of a person who in good faith pays the instrument or takes it for value.
An unauthorized signature may be ratified for all purposes of this chapter.
(2)  If the signature of more than one person is required to constitute the
authorized signature of an organization, the signature of the organization is
unauthorized if one of the required signatures is lacking.
(3)  The civil or criminal liability of a person who makes an unauthorized
signature is not affected by any provision of this chapter which makes the
unauthorized signature effective for the purposes of this chapter.
